Utah statutes.
63B-1a-103.   Refunding general obligation bonds.
(1)  The commission may provide for the refunding of any bonds in accordance
with Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act.
(2)  For purposes of Title 11, Chapter 27, Utah Refunding Bond Act, the state
is considered the public body and the commission is its governing body.
